Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.02
Foreign judgment, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act, foreign judgment means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of the United States or of any other court which is entitled to full faith and credit in this state.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 2.